District of Columbia statutes.
16-1119

Judgment when improvements and damages are equal.

When the value of the improvements, ascertained as provided by this chapter, equal but do not exceed the plaintiff’s damages, as found by the jury, the plaintiff shall be entitled to judgment only for the recovery of the property sued for and costs.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 567, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-1119.
1973 Ed., § 16-1119.